Nebraska, session 109, LB631.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB631 LB631
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-3111, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3111 (1) The School Emergency Response Mapping Fund is created.
The fund shall be administered by the State Department of Education and
consist of any money transferred by the Legislature and any gifts,
grants, or bequests. The department shall use the money in the fund for
grants related to facilitating the implementation of mapping data in
accordance with section 79-3110. Any funds available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer four million
five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars from the General Fund to the
School Emergency Response Mapping Fund for fiscal year 2025-26 2024-25
for the purpose of providing such grants.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-3111, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-